Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.080

Rendering criminal assistance in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of rendering criminal assistance in the second degree if he or she renders criminal assistance to a person who has committed or is being sought for a class B or class C felony or an equivalent juvenile offense or to someone being sought for violation of parole, probation, or community supervision.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, rendering criminal assistance in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(b) Rendering criminal assistance in the second degree is a misdemeanor if it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that the actor is a relative as defined in RCW 9A.76.060.

[ 2003 c 53 s 84; 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 22; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.080.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 47: See note following RCW 9.41.190.